Washington statutes.
RCW 35.56.290

Provisions of chapter not exclusive.

The provisions of this chapter shall not be construed as repealing or in any wise affecting other existing laws relative to the making of any such improvements but shall be considered as concurrent therewith.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.56.290. Prior: 1929 c 63 s 5; 1913 c 16 s 22; RRS s 9470.]